Missouri, session 2026, HB2247.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 143.011, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 143.011, to read as follows:
143.011. 1. A tax is hereby imposed for every [taxable] tax year on the Missouri
taxable income of every resident. The tax shall be determined by applying the tax table or the
rate provided in section 143.021, which is based upon the following rates:
If the Missouri taxable income The tax is:
is:
Not over $1,000.00 1 1/2% of the Missouri taxable income
Over $1,000 but not over $15 plus 2% of excess over $1,000
$2,000
Over $2,000 but not over $35 plus 2 1/2% of excess over $2,000
$3,000
Over $3,000 but not over $60 plus 3% of excess over $3,000
$4,000
Over $4,000 but not over $90 plus 3 1/2% of excess over $4,000
$5,000
Over $5,000 but not over $125 plus 4% of excess over $5,000
$6,000
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2247 2
Over $6,000 but not over $165 plus 4 1/2% of excess over $6,000
$7,000
Over $7,000 but not over $210 plus 5% of excess over $7,000
$8,000
Over $8,000 but not over $260 plus 5 1/2% of excess over $8,000
$9,000
Over $9,000 $315 plus 6% of excess over $9,000
2. (1) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection 1 of this section to the contrary,
beginning with the 2023 calendar year, the top rate of tax pursuant to subsection 1 of this
section shall be four and ninety-five hundredths percent.
(2) The modification of tax rates made pursuant to this subsection shall apply only to
tax years that begin on or after January 1, 2023.
(3) The director of the department of revenue shall, by rule, adjust the tax table
provided in subsection 1 of this section to effectuate the provisions of this subsection. The
top remaining rate of tax shall apply to all income in excess of seven thousand dollars, as
adjusted pursuant to subsection 5 of this section.
3. (1) In addition to the rate reduction under subsection 2 of this section, beginning
with the 2024 calendar year, the top rate of tax under subsection 1 of this section may be
reduced by fifteen hundredths of a percent. A reduction in the rate of tax shall take effect on
January first of a calendar year and such reduced rates shall continue in effect until the next
reduction occurs.
(2) A reduction in the rate of tax shall only occur if the amount of net general revenue
collected in the previous fiscal year exceeds the highest amount of net general revenue
collected in any of the three fiscal years prior to such fiscal year by at least one hundred
seventy-five million dollars.
(3) Any modification of tax rates under this subsection shall only apply to tax years
that begin on or after a modification takes effect.
(4) The director of the department of revenue shall, by rule, adjust the tax tables under
subsection 1 of this section to effectuate the provisions of this subsection.
4. (1) In addition to the rate reductions under subsections 2 and 3 of this section,
beginning with the calendar year immediately following the calendar year in which a
reduction is made pursuant to subsection 3 of this section, the top rate of tax under subsection
1 of this section may be further reduced over a period of years. Each reduction in the top rate
of tax shall be by one-tenth of a percent and no more than one reduction shall occur in a
calendar year. No more than three reductions shall be made under this subsection.

HB 2247 3
Reductions in the rate of tax shall take effect on January first of a calendar year and such
reduced rates shall continue in effect until the next reduction occurs.
(2) (a) A reduction in the rate of tax shall only occur if:
a. The amount of net general revenue collected in the previous fiscal year exceeds the
highest amount of net general revenue collected in any of the three fiscal years prior to such
fiscal year by at least two hundred million dollars; and
b. The amount of net general revenue collected in the previous fiscal year exceeds the
amount of net general revenue collected in the fiscal year five years prior, adjusted annually
by the percentage increase in inflation over the preceding five fiscal years.
(b) The amount of net general revenue collected required by subparagraph a. of
paragraph (a) of this subdivision in order to make a reduction pursuant to this subsection shall
be adjusted annually by the percent increase in inflation beginning with January 2, 2023.
(3) Any modification of tax rates under this subsection shall only apply to tax years
that begin on or after a modification takes effect.
(4) The director of the department of revenue shall, by rule, adjust the tax tables under
subsection 1 of this section to effectuate the provisions of this subsection. The bracket for
income subject to the top rate of tax shall be eliminated once the top rate of tax has been
reduced below the rate applicable to such bracket, and the top remaining rate of tax shall
apply to all income in excess of the income in the second highest remaining income bracket.
5. Beginning with the 2017 calendar year, the brackets of Missouri taxable income
identified in subsection 1 of this section shall be adjusted annually by the percent increase in
inflation. The director shall publish such brackets annually beginning on or after October 1,
2016. Modifications to the brackets shall take effect on January first of each calendar year
and shall apply to tax years beginning on or after the effective date of the new brackets.
6. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "CPI", the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers for the United States
as reported by the Bureau of Labor Statistics, or its successor index;
(2) "CPI for the preceding calendar year", the average of the CPI as of the close of the
twelve-month period ending on August thirty-first of such calendar year;
(3) "Net general revenue collected", all revenue deposited into the general revenue
fund, less refunds and revenues originally deposited into the general revenue fund but
designated by law for a specific distribution or transfer to another state fund;
(4) "Percent increase in inflation", the percentage, if any, by which the CPI for the
preceding calendar year exceeds the CPI for the year beginning September 1, 2014, and
ending August 31, 2015.
7. (1) In addition to the rate reductions under subsections 2, 3, and 4 of this
section, for all calendar years beginning on and after January 1, 2027, and ending on or

HB 2247 4
before December 31, 2036, the percentage of the rates of personal income tax imposed
under subsection 1 of this section shall be reduced annually each calendar year by one-
eleventh of the total percent of each rate of tax imposed upon each tax bracket as of
December 31, 2026. For all calendar years beginning on or after January 1, 2037, the
rates of tax shall be reduced to zero, there shall be no Missouri personal income tax
imposed under this section, and such tax shall be eliminated.
(2) Modifications of the personal income tax rates under the provisions of this
subsection shall take effect on January first of a calendar year, shall apply only to tax
years that begin on or after a modification takes effect, and shall continue in effect until
the next reduction occurs.
(3) The department of revenue shall, by rule and by posting on the department's
100 website, adjust and publish the tax tables under subsection 1 of this section to effectuate
101 the provisions of this subsection.
✔